en: FSC, Forest Stewardship Council
xx: FSC, Forest Stewardship Council
bg: FSC, Forest Stewardship Council, Съвет по стопанисване на горите
ca: FSC, Consell de Protecció Forestal
cs: Forest Stewardship Council / FSC
es: FSC, Forest Stewardship Council, Consejo de Administración Forestal
pl: FSC, Odpowiedzialna gospodarka leśna
pt: FSC, Forest Stewardship Council, Conselho de Manejo Florestal, Conselho de Gestão Florestal
ru: FSC, Forest Stewardship Council, Лесной попечительский совет
zh: FSC(森林管理委员会)

en: FSC Mix
xx: FSC Mix
bg: FSC Mix, FSC Смес
ca: Mix FSC
es: FSC Mixto
fr: FSC Mix, FSC Mixte
it: FSC Misto
pt: FSC Misto

en: FSC Recycling, FSC Recycled
de: FSC Recycling
fi: FSC-kierrätys
fr: FSC Recyclé, FSC Recyclage
it: FSC Riciclato
pt: FSC Reciclado
sv: FSC Recycled

en: PlantPack
xx: PlantPack, plant pack, PlantPack by Cloetta

en: without nano-particles
de: ohne Nanopartikel
fi: nanopartikkeliton, ei nanopartikkeleita, ilman nanopartikkeleita
fr: sans nano-particules
hu: Nanorészecskementes, nanorészecskét nem tartalmaz, nanorészecskék nélkül
pt: sem nano-partículas

en: No wheat, without wheat, Wheat-free
bg: Без пшеница
da: Uden hvede
de: Ohne Weizen
es: Sin trigo, libre de trigo
fr: Sans blé
it: Senza frumento
nl: Zonder graan
pt: Sem trigo, livre de trigo, 0% trigo
sv: Utan vete

en: No gluten, Gluten free, Without gluten, Gluten-free-food, free of gluten, Naturally gluten-free, ni gluten, free from gluten
bg: Без глутен
ca: Lliure de gluten, Sense gluten, No gluten, Aliment sense gluten, Lliure de gluten, Sense gluten d'orígen
cs: Bez lepku
cz: Bez lepku
da: Glutenfri, glutenfrit, glutenfrie
de: Glutenfrei, Frei von Gluten
el: Χωρίς γλουτένη
es: Sin gluten, Libre de gluten
et: Gluteenivaba
fi: gluteeniton, ilman gluteenia, ei gluteenia, gluteenivapaa, luonnollisesti gluteeniton
fr: Sans gluten
he: נטול גלוטן
hr: bez glutena
hu: Gluténmentes, Glutén nélkül, Gluténmentes élelmiszer, Nem tartalmaz glutént, Glutént nem tartalmaz
it: Senza glutine
ja: グルテンフリー
ko: 글루텐 프리
lt: Be glitimo
lv: Bez glutēna
nb: Uten gluten
nl: Glutenvrij, Gluten vrij, Vrij van gluten, Zonder gluten
pl: Bezglutenowy, Bez glutenu, Nie zawiera glutenu
pt: Sem glúten, isento de glúten
ro: Fără gluten
ru: Без глютена
sk: Bez lepku
sl: Brez glutena
sq: Pa gluten
sv: Glutenfri, glutenfritt, Fri från gluten
th: ไม่มีกลูเตน
tr: Glutensiz
uk: Не містить глютену
zh: 无麸质

en: Crossed Grain Trademark, CGT, Crossed Grain Symbol, Crossed Grain
xx: Crossed Grain Trademark, CGT, Crossed Grain Symbol, Crossed Grain
ca: Marca Registrada Espiga Barrada, Marca de l’Espiga Barrada
es: Marca Registrada Espiga Barrada, Espiga Barrada, Marca de la Espiga Barrada
fi: Gluteenittoman tuotteen merkki
fr: épi barré
gl: Marca Rexistrada Espiga Barrada, Espiga Barrada, Marca da Espiga Barrada
hr: Znak precrtane pšenice

en: free from dairy and gluten
hr: bez mliječnih bjelančevina i glutena
hu: glutént és tejterméket nem tartalmaz

en: CH-043-006
xx: CH-043-006

en: DZG Gluten free
xx: DZG glutenfrei
de: DZG glutenfrei

es: FACE, Federación de Asociaciones de Celiacos de España
xx: FACE, Federación de Asociaciones de Celiacos de España

fr: Afdiag, Association Française des Intolérants au Gluten
xx: Afdiag, Association Française des Intolérants au Gluten

en: Contains gluten
bg: Съдържа глутен
ca: Conté gluten
da: Indeholder gluten
de: Enthält Gluten
es: Contiene gluten
fi: sisältää gluteenia
fr: Contient du gluten
he: מכיל גלוטן
hu: Glutént tartalmaz, Gluténtartalmú
it: Contiene glutine
nl: Bevat gluten
pl: Zawiera gluten
pt: Contém glúten

en: Suitable for celiacs, suitable for coeliacs
es: Apto para celiacos

en: Canadian Celiac Association - Gluten Free
fr: Association canadienne de la maladie cœliaque - Sans gluten

en: Grain Free
fr: Sans grains, sans graines
zh: 无谷物

en: Seedless
de: kernlose
hr: bez sjemenki
it: senza semi
sv: utan kärnor, kärnfri, kärnfria
zh: 无籽

en: No thickening agent, No thickeners
bg: Без сгъстител, без сгъстители
ca: Sense agent espessidor, Sense espessidors
de: Ohne Verdickungsmittel
fi: sakeuttamisaineeton, ei sakeutusaineita
fr: Sans épaississant, Sans épaississants, Sans épaissisant, Sans épaissisants
hu: Sűrítőanyag nélkül, Sűrítőanyagmentes, sűrítőanyagot nem tartalmaz
it: Senza agenti addensanti
nl: Verdikkingsmiddelvrij, Zonder verdikkingsmiddel
pl: Bez substancji zagęszczających, Bez zagęstników
pt: Sem espessante, sem espessantes, sem agente espessante, sem agente de espessamento, sem agentes espessantes, sem agentes de espessamentos
ru: Без загустителя
zh: 无增稠剂

en: No added thickener
de: Ohne Zusatz von Verdickungsmitteln
es: Sin espesantes añadidos
fi: ei lisättyjä sakeutusaineita, ei lisättyjä sakeuttimia
fr: Sans épaississant ajouté, Sans epaissisant ajoute
hu: hozzáadott sűrítőanyag nélkül, hozzáadott sűrítőanyagot nem tartalmaz
it: Senza addensanti aggiunti
pt: Sem adição de espessantes, sem adição de espessante
ru: Без добавления загустителя
zh: 无添加增稠剂